Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.30.050

Career connected learning grant program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the career connected learning grant program is established as a competitive grant program to advance the career connect Washington vision under RCW 28C.30.040. The employment security department shall administer the program. The governor's office shall work with the employment security department to establish grant criteria and guide the process for selection with consultation from the career connected learning cross-agency work group.

(2) The purpose of the career connected learning grant program is to create career connected learning opportunities, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, that are both tailored to the local needs of students and employers and designed so that students may receive high school or college credit across industries and regions of the state to the maximum extent possible.

(3) The program funds shall be used for two overarching purposes:

(a) Support regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning networks in both rural and urban areas under subsection (5) of this section; and

(b) Support career connected learning program intermediaries working within and across regions who partner with multiple employers, labor partners, and educational institutions, work with K-12 and postsecondary career representatives to develop curricula for new and innovative programs, and scale existing career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and endorsed career launch programs.

(4) The program administrator shall consult with the governor's office and the career connected learning cross-agency work group established in RCW 28C.30.030 to develop a formal request for proposal for both the regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning networks and the program intermediaries.

(5)(a) Proposals for regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning networks and intermediaries may be sought from applicants within the geographic areas of the nine educational service districts. Successful applicants shall convene and manage regional, cross-industry networks that will lead to the expansion of career connected learning opportunities.

(b) Regional career connected learning and work-integrated learning network applicants must demonstrate regional knowledge and status as a trusted partner of industry and education stakeholders, a track record of success with career connected learning and aligned initiatives, and a commitment to equity. Regional career connected learning networks may include, but are not limited to, regional education networks, school districts, educational service districts, higher education institutions, workforce development councils, chambers of commerce, industry associations, joint labor management councils, multiemployer training partnerships, economic development councils, and nonprofit organizations.

(6) Eligible program intermediary applicants may include, but are not limited to, new or existing industry associations, joint labor management councils, regional networks, career technical student organizations, postsecondary education and training institutions working with multiple employer partners, state agencies, and other community-based organizations and expanded learning partners.

(7) Program intermediaries must work with appropriate faculty and staff at the state universities, the regional universities, and the state college, and K-12 education representatives, to expand the number of career launch program credits that may be articulated and transferred to postsecondary degree programs.

(8) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the employment security department, as the administrator of the program, has the authority to utilize funds deposited in the career connected learning account for the purposes of the program.

(9) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the employment security department must provide sufficient funding from amounts appropriated for the program to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide a grant to each of the nine educational service districts for costs of employing one full-time equivalent employee to support the expansion of career connected learning opportunities.

[ 2019 c 411 s 9; 2019 c 406 s 56.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2019 c 411 s 9: "Section 9 of this act takes effect only if chapter 406, Laws of 2019 is enacted by July 28, 2019." [ 2019 c 411 s 10.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: "(1) The legislature recognizes that in Washington's fast-growing economy local employers need access to a pool of diverse, skilled talent, but too few people are prepared for the career opportunities available. Across the state, there are persistent opportunity gaps in education and employment. Even in today's thriving economy, the path to economic self-sufficiency and fulfillment is difficult for many people.

(2) The legislature intends to scale up high quality career connected learning opportunities that address persistent educational opportunity gaps and meet the talent needs of employers. Through career connected learning opportunities that are available across communities and regions, individuals can advance their academic learning and build awareness of, exposure to, and preparation for, career opportunities.

(3) In order to create a statewide, sustainable career connected learning system, three areas must be addressed:

(a) Statewide system development through cross-sector coordination;

(b) Directing resources to K-12 and higher education partners to support enrollment in career launch and registered apprenticeship programs and other career connected learning opportunities; and

(c) Support for regional leadership and coordination to facilitate connections between industry and education, implement career connected learning programs, and help young adults and employers to navigate these opportunities." [ 2019 c 406 s 53.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.